Massachusetts, session 194th, S861.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 83. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
"Asset transfer disqualification'', a transfer of assets for less than fair market value by a
Medicaid applicant or recipient as set forth in 42 U.S.C. 1396p(c)(1)(A) and 42 U.S.C.
1396p(c)(1)(B).
"Costs of care'', all costs of health care and lodging and all related costs, including
transportation, medical and personal care and any other costs, charges and expenses incurred by
the facility in rendering care to the resident.
of 4

"Department'', the department of public health.
"Fiduciary'', a person to whom power or property has been formally entrusted for the
benefit of another such as an attorney-in-fact, legal guardian, trustee, or representative payee.
"Long-term care facility'', a facility licensed by the department of public health pursuant
to section 71 of chapter 111 of the General Laws.
“Patient liability amount'', the amount of income that a resident is liable to contribute
toward the cost of his or her nursing facility care.
"Period of asset transfer disqualification'', the period of ineligibility for Medicaid required
under 42 U.S.C. 1396p(c)(1)(E).
"Person'', persons both natural and otherwise, including, without limitation, any
corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust or other entity.
"Resident", any person who inhabits or inhabited a long-term care facility for any period
of time.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), when an asset transfer made on or after the
effective date of this section results in a final determination of a Medicaid asset transfer
disqualification, the person who received the assets from a resident which resulted in the
Medicaid asset transfer disqualification shall be liable under this section to the long-term care
facility for all costs of care up to the amount transferred to the person. The person shall be liable
at the facility's Medicaid rate for services for the period of asset transfer disqualification.
(c) It shall be an affirmative defense in any action instituted under subsection (b), that the
transfer of the asset which resulted in a final determination of a Medicaid asset transfer
of 4

disqualification was not a disqualifying transfer under 42 U.S.C. 1396p. The court's decision
regarding such affirmative defense shall be made independently of the determination made by
the department. If that affirmative defense is proven, the person shall not be liable under
subsection (b).
(d) The facility shall send a written notice of its intent to file the action to any person
whom it intends to name as a defendant in the action at least 45 days before filing an action
pursuant to this section.
(e) Any fiduciary or person who has received authority over the income of a resident such
as a person who has been given or otherwise obtained authority over a resident's bank account,
has been named as or has rights as a joint account holder, or otherwise has obtained or received
any control over a resident's bank account or any other income of a resident, shall be liable under
this section to the long-term care facility to the extent that any such person or fiduciary refuses to
pay the patient liability amount due under Medicaid, provided that the person or fiduciary is in
receipt of written notice from the department of the patient liability amount at the time such
income is received by the fiduciary or person, and provided further that the liability of the person
or fiduciary shall be for amounts going forward from the receipt of the notice. The facility shall
send a written notice of its intent to file the action to any person or fiduciary that it intends to
name as a defendant in the action at least 30 days before filing an action pursuant to this
subsection.
(f) No judgment obtained in any proceeding under this section shall be acted upon
through execution, levy, or otherwise during the pendency of any actually completed and filed
application for Medicaid. Attachments and trustee process to secure any judgment or potential
of 4

judgment shall be permitted subject to the discretion of the court to protect facilities from non-
payment or from the failure of the resident, or that resident's fiduciary, to cooperate in obtaining
Medicaid.
(g) Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit or otherwise diminish any other
causes of action possessed by any such long-term care facility. The death of the resident shall not
nullify or otherwise affect the liability of the person or persons charged with the cost of care
rendered or the patient liability amount as referenced in this section.
(g) A fiduciary under this section shall not be personally liable for the acts or omissions
of the fiduciary's predecessor, if any, solely by reason of his or her role as successor fiduciary.
of 4